Wisconsin, session 2025, AB462.
do enact as follows:AB462,11Section 1. 16.40 (24) of the statutes is created to read:AB462,2,9216.40 (24) Worker misclassification outreach. Direct all departments to 3provide targeted educational outreach regarding worker misclassification in 4English, Spanish, and other languages spoken by a significant number of 5individuals in this state, to employers, workers, and organizations that serve 6vulnerable populations, including individuals with limited English proficiency. 7The outreach shall emphasize the appropriate departments to contact and the 8rights of individuals to remain anonymous when reporting worker 9misclassification.AB462,210Section 2. 71.738 (1b) of the statutes is created to read:AB462,2,151171.738 (1b) “Construction industry employer” means an employer engaging in 12any activity related to the erection, construction, alteration, demolition, repair, or 13maintenance of buildings, structures, bridges, highways, roadways, dams, tunnels, 14sewers, underground buildings or structures, pipelines or ducts, or any other 15similar construction projects or facilities.AB462,316Section 3. 71.738 (3h) of the statutes is created to read:AB462,2,171771.738 (3h) “Proceeds” means taxes, fees, penalties, and interest.AB462,41Section 4. 71.738 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB462,3,2271.738 (3m) “Secretary” means the secretary of revenue.AB462,53Section 5. 71.815 of the statutes is created to read:AB462,3,14471.815 Construction industry whistleblowers. (1) Legal actions and 5awards. (a) If the department commences or is a party to an administrative or 6judicial action against a construction industry employer for an alleged violation of 7this chapter and the secretary determines that the action is based on specific and 8credible information brought to the secretary by an individual, the secretary shall 9provide that individual an award of at least 15 percent, but not more than 30 10percent, of the proceeds collected by the department as a result of the action or from 11any settlement in response to that action, except as provided in par. (b) and sub. (2). 12The secretary shall determine the amount of an award under this subsection based 13on the extent to which the information submitted by the individual contributed to 14the outcome of the administrative or judicial action or related settlement.AB462,3,2115(b) If the secretary determines that an administrative or judicial action 16against a construction industry employer for an alleged violation of this chapter is 17based principally on an individual's disclosure of an allegation resulting from an 18administrative or judicial hearing; from a government report, hearing, audit, or 19investigation; or from the news media, the secretary may provide the individual an 20award not to exceed 10 percent of the proceeds collected by the department as a 21result of the action or from any settlement in response to that action.AB462,4,222(2) Ineligible claims. (a) 1. If the secretary determines that the claim for an 23award under sub. (1) is brought by an individual who planned or initiated the 24actions or omissions that led to the alleged violation resulting in the administrative 1or judicial action in which that individual is a party, the secretary may reduce the 2amount of the award by an amount that the secretary considers appropriate. AB462,4,732. If the individual described under subd. 1. is convicted of criminal conduct 4arising from the individual's role in the alleged violation, the secretary may not 5provide an award to that individual. If the individual is convicted of criminal 6conduct arising from the individual's role in the violation after receiving an award, 7the secretary shall recapture the full amount of the award.AB462,4,118(b) 1. An individual who obtains information regarding an alleged violation of 9this chapter through the individual's official duties as an employee of the 10department or the department of justice is not eligible to receive an award under 11this section. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab462 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab462 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB462 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB462 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB462: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting